Massachusetts, session 194th, S2198.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Subsection (b) of section 20 of chapter 149A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the last sentence and inserting in place thereof the following: The awarding authority 
shall require the sealed price proposal to be submitted no more than five calendar days after 
submission of the sealed technical proposal.